Tennessee, session 114, SB0451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-39-203(i), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) The name, physical address, mailing address if different from physical
address, and phone number of any church, temple, or other religious group or
organization in this state where the offender is a registered member;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-39-206(d), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(17) The name and address of any church, temple, or other religious group or
organization in this state where the offender is a registered member.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-39-206(d), is amended by
deleting "subdivisions (d)(1)-(16)" wherever it appears and substituting "subdivisions (d)(1)-
(17)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-39-214(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Any church, temple, or other religious group or organization in this state
where the offender is a registered member;
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0451
002168
- 1 -